Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 29 Fees

9-29-1.
District court fees.

Every district court shall be allowed the following fees, in full, to be taxed in the bill of costs in every civil action:

For the entry of every small claim $55.00. (2) For the entry of every other action $80.00. (3) For every writ of execution $20.00.

In addition to the fees set forth herein, the district court shall apply a technology surcharge assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

Provided, that five dollars ($5.00) of the fee for the entry of every action in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) or writ in subdivision (a)(3) shall be forwarded to Rhode Island Legal Services.

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1517, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-1

; P.L. 1960, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 6, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 212, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 300, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 14; P.L. 2009, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 5.

9-29-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-2

; Repealed by P.L. 1982, ch. 260, § 1.

9-29-3.
Deposition fees.

To all officers empowered to take depositions, there shall be allowed:

For every hour necessarily employed . . . . . $.40

For every page of 200 words . . . . . .30

For every mile’s travel to the place of caption . . . . . .10

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-3

.

9-29-4.
Costs allowed parties and attorneys in superior court.

The following fees shall be taxed and allowed in bills of costs to attorneys and parties in the superior court in civil cases:

To the attorney of the party obtaining judgment $5.00 (2) To plaintiff’s solicitor for every complaint, original and supplemental 5.00 (3) To defendant’s solicitor for every answer, original or supplemental, one only to be taxed, though several filed, if defense be joint 5.00

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 7; C.P.A. 1905, § 1198; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-4

.

9-29-5.
Jurors’ fees.

All grand and petit jurors shall be paid for each day’s attendance on the superior court twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day commencing July 1, 2022, and thereafter. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Any grand or petit juror may, upon signing a form approved by the presiding justice of the superior court, donate their jury fee to the state. Any such donation shall be deposited into the general fund and shall be allocated to the Rhode Island Veterans Home Community Living Center.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 8; P.L. 1902, ch. 981, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; P.L. 1907, ch. 1459, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 8; P.L. 1917, ch. 1482, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 8; P.L. 1930, ch. 1535, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 8; P.L. 1951, ch. 2707, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-5

; P.L. 1959, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 3, art. I, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 159, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 174, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 175, § 1, effective July 6, 2021.

9-29-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 802, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-6

; P.L. 1967, ch. 150, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1983, ch. 3, art. I, § 2.

9-29-7.
Witness fees.

The fees of witnesses shall be:

For every day’s attendance before the supreme or superior court, or before any other tribunal or magistrate, including attendance in giving depositions $10.00 (2) For every mile’s travel 10.00 (3) For every day’s commitment in jail upon default to enter into recognizance with surety 2.00

In addition to the fees above provided, witnesses summoned and testifying as experts in behalf of the state, or any person acting as an interpreter, before the supreme, superior, or district court, may be allowed and paid such sum as such court may deem just and reasonable.

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 10; C.P.A. 1905, § 1199; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 10; P.L. 1939, ch. 715, § 7; P.L. 1956, ch. 3624, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-7

; P.L. 1974, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 56, § 1.

9-29-8.
Certification as to witness fees.

Every witness before obtaining any fees, except the amount which in certain cases must be tendered to him or her before he or she can be compelled to attend, shall give a certificate to the clerk of the court wherein or before whom his or her attendance shall be given, certifying the number of days he or she shall have attended and the number of miles he or she shall have traveled, in pursuance of a summons issued for that purpose, which certificate shall be subject to the examination of the court, and the allowance shall be made thereon as may be lawfully due; provided, that a certificate may be made for travel and attendance without a summons, in case a witness for the state comes from without the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-8

.

9-29-9.
Fees of sheriffs, sergeants, and constables.

The fees, including mileage, of deputy sheriffs, town sergeants, and constables, for which a deposit to insure payment may be required, shall not exceed the following:

For serving any writ of replevin, or out of state papers $100.00 (2) For serving all other writs, citations, or subpoenas $45.00 (3) For a writ copy of every one hundred words $2.00 (4) For every writ returned when the defendant cannot be found $15.00 (5) For serving any writ of arrest or body attachment $100.00

The above fees shall be deposited as general revenue.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 466, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 40; P.L. 2006, ch. 587, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 21.

9-29-10.
Compensation for keeping of attached personal property.

The superior court or district courts, upon petition made by any sheriff or other officer setting forth the facts on oath, may allow such fair compensation for the keeping of personal property attached and held on mesne process as shall on examination be found to be reasonable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 13; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-10

.

9-29-11.
Allowances for service of search warrant and aid in other process.

A reasonable allowance may be made by any court or magistrate to an officer serving a search warrant and to any person employed by an officer as aid in the service of any process, whenever the allowance shall be adjudged necessary by the court or justice, not exceeding in any case one dollar ($1.00) per day to each person so employed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-11

.

9-29-12.
Certification and search fees.

To all recording and certifying officers, unless otherwise specifically provided, there shall be allowed:

For every page of 100 words recorded or copies $.20 (2) For searching the records by the hour 1.00

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 6; P.L. 1920, ch. 1886, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-12

.

9-29-13.
Naturalization fees.

No fee shall be required in any court upon any declaration or petition under the naturalization laws of the United States, or for any process or procedure thereunder, except as hereinafter provided. The clerk’s fee in such cases, including certificate, shall be five dollars ($5.00), which shall be deposited into the general fund and credited to the supreme court account.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, §§ 26, 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, §§ 22, 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, §§ 22, 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, §§ 22, 23; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-13

; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 55, § 1.

9-29-14.
Legal Aid Society and Rhode Island Legal Services, Inc. exempt from fees.

Neither the Legal Aid Society of Rhode Island nor Rhode Island Legal Services, Inc. shall be required to pay any fees to the superior court, family court, or district courts or the clerks thereof or any fees or charges for the service or travel of deputy sheriffs for serving any writ, citation, subpoena or other process or for taking bail, bond, or inventory or for making copies of writs for or in behalf of the organizations or their clients; provided, however, that fees and charges authorized by law shall nevertheless be taxable as costs.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 417, § 22, as enacted by P.L. 1936, ch. 2393, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-14

; P.L. 1992, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 21.

9-29-14.1.
The state exempt from fees.

The state of Rhode Island, its departments, agencies, boards, and commissions shall not be required to pay any fees, including appeal fees, to the superior court or district courts or the clerks thereof, or any fees or charges for the service or travel of deputy sheriffs for serving any writ, citation, subpoena, or other process or for taking bail, bond, or inventory or for making copies of writs for or in behalf of the state; provided, however, that fees and charges authorized by law shall nevertheless be taxable as costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 21.

9-29-15.
Indorsement of fees on process.

Every officer who shall serve any process, civil or criminal, shall indorse thereon the several items which constitute the amount of his or her fees, and on failure thereof the fees shall not be taxed or allowed in any bill of costs, nor be recoverable by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-15

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 25.

9-29-16.
Compensation of officers selected by attorney general.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary to compensate the officers who shall be selected by the attorney general, who shall keep the names and make the disbursements and returns as provided by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 15; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-16

.

9-29-17.
Fixed salary provisions preserved.

None of the provisions of this chapter shall be construed to contravene in any manner the provisions of §§

36-6-6

—

36-6-8

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

9-29-17

.

9-29-18.
Superior court fees.

The superior court shall be allowed the following fees in full to be taxed in the bill of costs in every civil action:

For entry of every civil action or petition $160.00. (2) For every writ of execution $50.00. (3) For the issuance of every citation $25.00.

In addition to the fees set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the superior court shall apply a technology surcharge on all filing fees assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

Provided, that ten dollars ($10.00) of the fee for the entry of every civil action or petition shall be forwarded to Rhode Island Legal Services.

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L., §

9-29-18

, as enacted by P.L. 1961, ch. 89, § 2; P.L. 1971, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 37, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 41, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 5.

9-29-19.
Family court fees.

The family court shall be allowed the following fees in full to be taxed in the bill of costs in every domestic relations or other civil proceeding:

For the entry of every petition, complaint, or action $120.00. (2) For every writ of execution $40.00.

In addition to the fees as set forth herein, the family court shall apply a technology surcharge fee assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

Provided, that ten dollars ($10.00) of the fee for the entry of every petition, complaint or action shall be forwarded to Rhode Island Legal Services.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 9; P.L. 1982, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 41, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 5.

9-29-20.
Supreme court fees.

The supreme court, by a majority of its members, shall have the power to prescribe by rule a fee of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for docketing a civil appeal or docketing any other proceeding brought to review a civil matter and to prescribe a waiver of the fee as to a person who is unable to pay the fee.

The court may apply a technology or other surcharge for docketing a civil appeal or docketing any other proceeding brought before the court in an amount not to exceed eighty-five dollars ($85.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 5.

9-29-21.
Attorney or unrepresented party must sign papers — Sanctions for frivolous suits.

In any legal action based upon a cause of action arising on or after July 1, 1987, every pleading, motion, and other paper of a party represented by an attorney shall be signed by at least one attorney of record in his or her individual name, whose address and telephone number shall be stated. A party who is not represented by an attorney shall sign his or her pleading, motion, or other paper and state his or her address and telephone number. Except when otherwise specifically provided by rule or statute, pleadings need not be verified or accompanied by affidavit. The signature of an attorney or party constitutes a certificate by him or her that he or she has read the pleading, motion, or other paper; that to the best of his or her knowledge, information, and belief formed after reasonable inquiry it is well grounded in fact and is warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for the extension, modification, or reversal of existing law, and that it is not interposed for any improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessary delay or needless increase in the cost of litigation. If a pleading, motion, or other paper is not signed, it shall be stricken unless it is signed promptly after the omission is called to the attention of the pleader or movant. If a pleading, motion, or other paper is signed in violation of this rule, the court, upon motion or upon its own initiative, may impose upon the person who signed it, a represented party, or both, an appropriate sanction, which may include an order to pay to the other party or parties the amount of the reasonable expenses incurred because of the filing of the pleading, motion, or other paper, including a reasonable attorney’s fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 350, § 6; P.L. 1987, ch. 522, § 8.